hyph-utf8/tex/generic/hyph-utf8/patterns/txt/hyph-af.pat.txt
3i4n5genieur
in3ge1
be1las1tin4g3
be1las1tin4g4s
1ket1tin4g
1ket1tin4g1a
1ket1tin4g1e
1ket1tin4g1r
ket1t
1lin2g1a
1lin3ge
1lin2g1in
1lin2g1r
ko1rin4g
rig1tin4g
rig1t
ves1tin4g
4d3ste.
4d3stes.
es1te.
e2s3tes.
e2s3ter.
e2s3ters.
4f3ste.
4f3ster
4f3stes.
4g3ste.
4g3ster
4g3sters
4g4s1te1ra
4g4s1ter1m
4g4s1ter2m.
4g4s1ter1rei
4g3ster1r
4g3stes.
4k3ste.
4k3ster
4k4s1te1ra
4k3sters
4k3stes.
4l3ste.
4l3ster
4l3sters
4l3stes.
4m3ste.
4m3ster
4m3sters
4m3stes.
4n3ste.
4n3stes.
4n3ster
4n3sters
4n4s1te1ra
4n5s2te2r1ag
4n3ster1m
4n3ster2m.
4n3ster1rei
4n3ster1r
4p3ste.
4p3ster
4p4s1ter1m
4p3stes.
4r3ste
4r4s1tee.
4r4s1teer
4r4s1teg
4r4s3te1hui
4r3ste1hu
4r4s1te1ken
4r3s2te1ke
4r4s1tem1po
4r4s1tend
4r4s1tens
4r3ster
4r3stes.
4t3ste.
4t3stes.
d2s1k2l
g2s1t2r
ng2str
ng1dr
n2s1k2l
n2g2s1k2l
2s1k2l2
1s2k2l2e1ro1
2s3aan
me3s4aan
se3s4aan
mo3s4aan
s1lie
.eks1
.ek1s2a
.ek1s2e
.ek1s2i
.ek1s2o
.ek1s2u
.ek1s2y
ëks1
ëk1s2a
ëk1s2e
ëk1s2i
ëk1s2o
ëk1s2u
ëk1s2y
s1tr
b1s2tr
s2trak
s2trek
s2trem
s2trib
s2triem
s2trop
s2trok
s2tronk
1s2t2ro1fa
1s2t2ro1fe.
1s2t2ro1fes
1s2t2ro1fies
stro1fe
s1tro1fie
